Utah statutes.
9-9-202.   Special elections on acceptance or retrocession of state jurisdiction.

(1)  State jurisdiction acquired or retroceded pursuant to this chapter with respect to criminal offenses or civil causes of action shall be applicable in Indian country only where the enrolled Indians residing within the affected area of the Indian country accept state jurisdiction or request its retrocession by a majority vote of the adult Indians voting at a special election held for that purpose.

(2)  These special elections shall be called pursuant to federal law.

